Louisiana, session 2026, SB145.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:2166.11 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2166.11. Generator; alternative electrical power source
A. All licensed adult residential care providers shall have a generator or
other alternative electrical power source in the event of the loss of primary
electrical power in accordance with this Section. "Alternative electrical power
source" shall include mobile generators, shared campus systems, contracted
generators, or other engineered emergency power solution.
B. The generator or alternative electrical power source shall have a
simultaneous capability of providing sufficient electrical power for all of the
following:
(1) Life safety systems.
(2) Lighting in patient care areas.
(3) Medical equipment in patient care areas.
(4) Electrical components of the approved potable water system.
(5) Electrical components of the approved sewer system.
(6) Operation of the adult residential care provider's medication
dispensing and medication refrigerator systems.
(7) Operation of the adult residential care provider's dietary services and
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 145 ENROLLED
related refrigeration.
(8) Operation of the adult residential care provider's laundry services.
(9) Systems necessary to maintain a clinically safe indoor temperature
sufficient to protect residents from heat- or cold-related harm.
C.(1) The generator or alternative electrical power source shall either be
installed permanently onsite at the adult residential care provider facility or
provided through an alternative method, including mobile, shared, or
temporary systems. The adult residential care provider shall have an adequate
supply of fuel to operate the generator or alternative electrical power source
under full load for a minimum of seventy-two hours. The fuel shall be stored
onsite at the adult residential care provider facility, delivered to the provider
prior to the emergency event through contracted fuel delivery agreements or
shared fuel resources, or any combination thereof.
(2) Natural gas is an allowable fuel source and meets the onsite fuel
requirement if there is a direct municipal gas line or an onsite propane tank
sufficient in size to meet the fuel requirements provided for this in this Section.
D. Each adult residential care provider shall have fuel delivery
agreements in place that will extend the uninterrupted operation of the
generator or alternative electrical power source under full load for the duration
of a single emergency event. Adult residential care providers may interrupt
operation of the generator or alternative electrical power source to conduct
routine maintenance as recommended by the manufacturer's specifications.
E. Each adult residential care provider that does not have a permanently
installed onsite generator or alternative electrical power source shall do all of
the following:
(1) Have a rapid connect system for any contracted or mobile generators
and electrical power.
(2) Annually update its emergency operations plan to include provisions
for the health and safety of the provider's residents in the event of a power loss.
The plan shall include information on the mobile generators, shared campus
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 145 ENROLLED
systems, contracted generators, other engineered power solutions, rapid connect
systems, and fuel arrangements and agreements. The provider's emergency
operations plan, or specific information contained in the plan, shall be
submitted to the Louisiana Department of Health upon request.
F. Adult residential care providers shall meet the requirements of this
Section no later than July 1, 2027. The department may grant a one-time
extension, not to exceed twelve months, upon written application by an adult
residential care provider that compliance with this Section has been delayed due
to extraordinary and unforeseen circumstances. No extension shall be granted
if the adult residential care provider fails to provide sufficient evidence of
substantial compliance or good faith efforts to comply with the requirement
deadline provided for in this Subsection.
G. The department, after consultation with the office of the state fire
marshal, may promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the provisions of this Section. The
department is authorized to utilize the emergency rulemaking process provided
in R.S. 49:962 for adoption of the rules and regulations to implement the
provisions of this Section.
H. The office of the state fire marshal shall determine the adult
residential care provider's compliance with the provisions of Subsections B
through D of this Section. The office of the state fire marshal may require the
adult residential care provider to submit plan review applications with required
documentation, conduct on-site inspections, and determine that an alternative
electric power source is not compliant or not able to safely operate to meet the
requirements of this Section. Any noncompliance shall be referred to the
department.
Section 2. The Louisiana Department of Health shall convene a stakeholder advisory
workgroup, including representatives of the Louisiana Assisted Living Association and
LeadingAge Southeast, to discuss implementation, compliance progress, potential barriers,
and rulemaking of the provisions provided for in this Act. The stakeholder advisory
Page 3 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 145 ENROLLED
workgroup shall be convened for its first meeting no later than October 1, 2026, by the
department and shall terminate no later than July 1, 2028.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.